Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1353.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 303(c) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 303. Game Commission officers and employees.* * *(c) Power and authority.--[Every officer, employee or representative] Except as provided in section 901(a.1) (relating to powers and duties of enforcement officers), every officer of the commission in the exercise of their powers and duties shall have the right and authority to go upon or enter any property[, posted or otherwise,] outside of buildings.Section 2. Section 901(a)(2) and (8) of Title 34 are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:12345678910111213141516171819 § 901. Powers and duties of enforcement officers.(a) Powers.--Any officer whose duty it is to enforce this title or any officer investigating any alleged violation of this title shall have the power and duty to:* * *(2) [Go] Except as provided in subsection (a.1), go upon any land or water outside of buildings, except curtilage, [posted or otherwise,] in the performance of the officer's duty.* * *[(8) Conduct administrative inspections of persons, licenses and permits, firearms, ammunition and other implements of taking, game bags, game, meat poles, tags, clothing, waterfowl blinds, decoys, tree stands, immediate hunting locations, or any means of transportation or its attachments used as blinds or as hunting locations, and any coolers or containers possessed at a hunting location when prima facie evidence of hunting exists. Any officer conducting an administrative inspection shall, if any person is present, present a badge or other means of official identification and state the purpose of the inspection.]* * *(a.1) Prohibition.--An officer may not go upon any land as to which notice against trespass is given by any of the following:(1) A ctual communication to the officer by the landowner.(2) Posting in a manner prescribed by law or reasonably likely to come to the attention of intruders.(3) Fencing or other enclosure manifestly designed to 20250HB1353PN1541 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 exclude intruders.(4) The placement of identifying purple paint marks on trees or posts on the property line that are:(i) vertical lines of not less than eight inches in length and not less than one inch in width;(ii) p laced so that the bottom of the mark is not less than three feet from the ground and not more than five feet from the ground; and(iii) placed at locations that are readily visible to a person approaching the property and not more than 100 feet apart.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1353PN1541 - 3 - 12345678910111213